North Dakota, session 69, HB1235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 4.1-01-27 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
2. The agriculture commissioner, in consultation with the director of the department of
transportation, shall award grants to political subdivisionsa county, township, or city with a
population of one thousand five hundred residents or less, for road and bridge improvements
necessary to accommodate value-added agriculture businesses. Grant funding under this
subsection may be used for:
a. Corridor improvements on city, county, and township roadways; and
b. Improvements to roads or bridges that provide access to value-added agriculture
businesses.

H. B. NO. 1235 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1235.
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 3 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State